Washington statutes.
RCW 35.62.041

Ballot—More than one name proposed—Votes necessary.

Where more than one name is proposed by either petition or resolution, the question shall be separated into two separate parts and shall be in substantially the following form:

"Shall the name of the city (or town) of (insert name) be changed?

Yes . . .

No . . ."

"If a name change is approved, which of the following should be the new name?

(insert name)

(insert name)

Vote for one."

Voters may select a name change whether or not they vote in favor of changing the name of the city or town. If a majority of the votes cast on the first proposition favor changing the name, the name that receives at least a majority of the total number of votes cast for an alternative name shall become the new name of the city or town effective thirty days after the certification of the election results.

If no alternative name receives a simple majority vote, then an election shall be held at the next November special election date, at which voters shall be given the option of choosing which of the two alternative names that received the most votes shall become the new name of the city or town. This ballot proposition shall be worded substantially as follows:

"Which of the following names shall become the new name of the city (or town) of (insert name) ?

(insert name)

(insert name)

Vote for one."

The name that receives the majority vote shall become the new name of the city or town effective thirty days after the certification of the election results.

[ 1990 c 193 s 3.]